Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20102-955
Notice; kinds; effect; failure to comply;
powers of control authority.

(1) Notices for control of noxious
weeds shall consist of two kinds: General notices, as prescribed by rules
and regulations adopted and promulgated by the director, which notices shall
be on a form prescribed by the director; and individual notices, which notices
shall be on a form prescribed by this section. Failure to publish general
weed notices or to serve individual notices as provided in this section shall
not relieve any person from the necessity of full compliance with the Noxious
Weed Control Act and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant
to the act.

(a) General notice shall be published by each control authority, in
one or more newspapers of general circulation throughout the area over which
the control authority has jurisdiction, on or before May 1 of each year and
at such other times as the director may require or the control authority may
determine.

(b) Whenever any control authority finds it necessary to secure more
prompt or definite control of weeds on particular land than is accomplished
by the general published notice, it shall cause to be served individual notice
upon the owner of record of such land at his or her last-known address, giving
specific instructions and methods when and how certain named weeds are to
be controlled. Such methods may include definite systems of tillage, cropping,
management, and use of livestock.

Each control authority shall use one or both of the following forms
for all individual notices: (i)

................. County Weed Control Authority

OFFICIAL NOTICE

Section 2-952, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, places an affirmative
duty upon every person to control noxious weeds on land under such person's
ownership or control. Information received by the control authority, including
an onsite investigation by the county weed control superintendent or a deputy,
indicated the existence of an uncontrolled noxious weed infestation on property
owned by you at: ................................... .

The noxious weed or weeds are ............ . The method of control recommended
by the control authority is as follows: ..................................
.

Other appropriate control methods are acceptable if approved by the
county weed control superintendent.

Because the stage of growth of the noxious weed infestation on the above-specified
property warrants immediate control, if such infestation remains uncontrolled
after ten days from the date specified at the bottom of this notice, the control
authority may enter upon such property for the purpose of taking the appropriate
weed control measures. Costs for the control activities of the control authority
shall be at the expense of the owner of the property and shall become a lien
on the property as a special assessment levied on the date of control.

......................... Weed Control Superintendent

Dated.............;

or (ii)

............. County Weed Control Authority

OFFICIAL NOTICE

Section 2-952, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, places an affirmative
duty upon every person to control noxious weeds on land under such person's
ownership or control. Information received by the control authority, including
an onsite investigation by the county weed control superintendent or a deputy,
indicates the existence of an uncontrolled noxious weed infestation on property
owned by you at: .............................. .

The noxious weed or weeds are ............... . The method of control
recommended by the control authority is as follows: .................................
.

Other appropriate control methods are acceptable if approved by the
county weed control superintendent. If, within fifteen days from the date
specified at the bottom of this notice, the noxious weed infestation on such
property, as specified above, has not been brought under control, you may,
upon conviction, be subject to a fine of $100.00 per day for each day of noncompliance
beginning on .............., up to a maximum of fifteen days of noncompliance
(maximum $1,500).

Upon request to the control authority, within fifteen days from the
date specified at the bottom of this notice, you are entitled to a hearing
before the control authority to challenge the existence of a noxious weed
infestation on property owned by you at ........................ .

....................... Weed Control Superintendent

Dated............. .

In all counties having a population of three hundred thousand or more
inhabitants, the control authority may dispense with the individual notices
and may publish general notices if published in one or more newspapers of
general circulation throughout the area over which such control authority
has jurisdiction. Such notice shall be published weekly for four successive
weeks prior to May 1 of each year or at such other times as the control authority
deems necessary. In no event shall a fine be assessed against a landowner
as prescribed in subdivision (3)(a) of this section unless the control authority
has caused individual notice to be served upon the landowner as specified
in this subdivision.

(2) At the request of any owner served with an individual notice pursuant
to subdivision (1)(b)(ii) of this section, the control authority shall hold
an informal public hearing to allow such landowner an opportunity to be heard
on the question of the existence of an uncontrolled noxious weed infestation
on such landowner's property.

(3) Whenever the owner of the land on which noxious weeds are present
has neglected or failed to control them as required pursuant to the act and
any notice given pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the control authority
having jurisdiction shall proceed as follows:

(a) If, within fifteen days from the date specified on the notice required
by subdivision (1)(b)(ii) of this section, the owner has not taken action
to control the noxious weeds on the specified property and has not requested
a hearing pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the control authority
shall notify the county attorney who shall proceed against such owner as prescribed
in this subdivision. A person who is responsible for an infestation of noxious
weeds on particular land under his or her ownership and who refuses or fails
to control the weeds on the infested area within the time designated in the
notice delivered by the control authority shall, upon conviction, be guilty
of an infraction pursuant to sections 29-431 to 29-438, except that the penalty
shall be a fine of one hundred dollars per day for each day of violation up
to a total of one thousand five hundred dollars for fifteen days of noncompliance;
or

(b) If, within ten days from the date specified in the notice required
by subdivision (1)(b)(i) of this section, the owner has not taken action to
control the noxious weeds on the specified property and the stage of growth
of such noxious weeds warrants immediate control to prevent spread of the
infestation to neighboring property, the control authority may cause proper
control methods to be used on such infested land, including necessary destruction
of growing crops, and shall advise the record owner of the cost incurred in
connection with such operation. The cost of any such control shall be at the
expense of the owner. In addition the control authority shall immediately
cause notice to be filed of possible unpaid weed control assessments against
the property upon which the control measures were used in the register of
deeds office in the county where the property is located. If unpaid for two
months, the control authority shall certify to the county treasurer the amount
of such expense and such expense shall become a lien on the property upon
which the control measures were taken as a special assessment levied on the
date of control. The county treasurer shall add such expense to and it shall
become and form a part of the taxes upon such land and shall bear interest
at the same rate as taxes.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to limit satisfaction
of the obligation imposed hereby in whole or in part by tax foreclosure proceedings.
The expense may be collected by suit instituted for that purpose as a debt
due the county or by any other or additional remedy otherwise available. Amounts
collected under subdivision (3)(b) of this section shall be deposited to the
noxious weed control fund of the control authority or, if no noxious weed control fund exists, to the county
general fund.

Laws 1965, c. 7, § 4, p. 82;

Laws 1969, c. 13, § 4, p. 158;

Laws 1974, LB 694, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 14, § 5;

Laws 1983, LB 154, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 1, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 138, § 6;

Laws 1989, LB 49, § 7;

Laws 1995, LB 589, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB731, § 2.
July 15, 2010
Pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section, proof of proper notice is an element of the State's prima facie case. Pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section, in order to prove notice, it must be shown that the county control authority made a finding of uncontrolled noxious weeds and issued proper notice to defendant or delegated its statutory duty to the weed control superintendent to make such findings and to give such notice. State v. Beethe, 249 Neb. 743, 545 N.W.2d 108 (1996); State v. Brozovsky, 249 Neb. 723, 545 N.W.2d 98 (1996).

A court may not impose probation upon a defendant convicted under subsection (3)(a) of this section. State v. Martin, 3 Neb. App. 555, 529 N.W.2d 545 (1995).